closure.aff
# all categories
PFX a N 182
PFX all  0       auto
PFX all  0       aut    [aeiou]
PFX all  0       co
PFX all  0       contro
PFX all  0       contr  [aeiou]
PFX all  0       dis    [^s]
PFX all  0       di     s[^aeiou]
PFX all  0       inter
PFX all  0       post
PFX all  0       pos    [^aeious]
PFX all  0       pos    s[aeiou]
PFX all   pre    post
PFX all   pre    pos    pre[^aeious]
PFX all   pre    pos    pres[aeiou]
PFX all   pr     post   pre
PFX all  0       pre
PFX all  0       pr     e
PFX all   post   pre
PFX all   post   pr     poste
PFX all   pos    pre    pos[^aeioust]
PFX all   pos    pre    poss[aeiou]
PFX all   pos    pre    post[^t]
PFX all  0       ri     [^i]
PFX all  0       re
PFX all  0       r      [aeiou]
PFX all  0       retro
PFX all  0       retr   [aeiou]
PFX all  0       s      [^aeiougsz]
PFX all  0       s      g[^ln]
PFX all  0       sopra
PFX all  0       sopr   [aeiou]
PFX all  0       soprab b
PFX all  0       soprac c
PFX all  0       soprad d
PFX all  0       sopraf f
PFX all  0       soprag g
PFX all  0       sopral l
PFX all  0       sopram m
PFX all  0       sopran n
PFX all  0       soprap p
PFX all  0       soprar r
PFX all  0       sopras s[aeiou]
PFX all  0       soprat t
PFX all  0       soprav v
PFX all  0       sopraz z
PFX all   sotto  sopra
PFX all   sott   sopr
PFX all   sotto  sopr   sotto[aeiou]
PFX all   sott   sopra
PFX all   sotto  soprab sottob
PFX all   sotto  soprac sottoc
PFX all   sotto  soprad sottod
PFX all   sotto  sopraf sottof
PFX all   sotto  soprag sottog
PFX all   sotto  sopral sottol
PFX all   sotto  sopram sottom
PFX all   sotto  sopran sotton
PFX all   sotto  soprap sottop
PFX all   sotto  soprar sottor
PFX all   sotto  sopras sottos[aeiou]
PFX all   sotto  soprat sottot
PFX all   sotto  soprav sottov
PFX all   sotto  sopraz sottoz
PFX all   sub    sopra
PFX all   sub    sopr   sub[aeiou]
PFX all  0       sovra
PFX all  0       sovr   [aeiou]
PFX all  0       sovrab b
PFX all  0       sovrac c
PFX all  0       sovrad d
PFX all  0       sovraf f
PFX all  0       sovrag g
PFX all  0       sovral l
PFX all  0       sovram m
PFX all  0       sovran n
PFX all  0       sovrap p
PFX all  0       sovrar r
PFX all  0       sovras s[aeiou]
PFX all  0       sovrat t
PFX all  0       sovrav v
PFX all  0       sovraz z
PFX all   sotto  sovra
PFX all   sott   sovr
PFX all   sotto  sovr   sotto[aeiou]
PFX all   sott   sovra
PFX all   sotto  sovrab sottob
PFX all   sotto  sovrac sottoc
PFX all   sotto  sovrad sottod
PFX all   sotto  sovraf sottof
PFX all   sotto  sovrag sottog
PFX all   sotto  sovral sottol
PFX all   sotto  sovram sottom
PFX all   sotto  sovran sotton
PFX all   sotto  sovrap sottop
PFX all   sotto  sovrar sottor
PFX all   sotto  sovras sottos[aeiou]
PFX all   sotto  sovrat sottot
PFX all   sotto  sovrav sottov
PFX all   sotto  sovraz sottoz
PFX all   sub    sovra
PFX all   sub    sovr   sub[aeiou]
PFX all  0       sotto
PFX all  0       sott   [aeiou]
PFX all   sopra  sotto
PFX all   sopr   sott
PFX all   sopra  sott   sopra[aeiou]
PFX all   sopr   sotto
PFX all   soprab sotto  soprabb
PFX all   soprac sotto  sopracc
PFX all   soprad sotto  sopradd
PFX all   sopraf sotto  sopraff
PFX all   soprag sotto  sopragg
PFX all   sopral sotto  soprall
PFX all   sopram sotto  sopramm
PFX all   sopran sotto  soprann
PFX all   soprap sotto  soprapp
PFX all   soprar sotto  soprarr
PFX all   sopras sotto  soprass
PFX all   soprat sotto  sopratt
PFX all   soprav sotto  sopravv
PFX all   sopraz sotto  soprazz
PFX all   sovra  sotto
PFX all   sovr   sott
PFX all   sovra  sott   sovra[aeiou]
PFX all   sovr   sotto
PFX all   sovrab sotto  sovrabb
PFX all   sovrac sotto  sovracc
PFX all   sovrad sotto  sovradd
PFX all   sovraf sotto  sovraff
PFX all   sovrag sotto  sovragg
PFX all   sovral sotto  sovrall
PFX all   sovram sotto  sovramm
PFX all   sovran sotto  sovrann
PFX all   sovrap sotto  sovrapp
PFX all   sovrar sotto  sovrarr
PFX all   sovras sotto  sovrass
PFX all   sovrat sotto  sovratt
PFX all   sovrav sotto  sovravv
PFX all   sovraz sotto  sovrazz
PFX all   super  sotto
PFX all   super  sott   super[aeiou]
PFX all  0       stra
PFX all  0       str    a
PFX all  0       sub
PFX all   sopra  sub
PFX all   sopr   sub
PFX all   soprab sub    soprabb
PFX all   soprac sub    sopracc
PFX all   soprad sub    sopradd
PFX all   sopraf sub    sopraff
PFX all   soprag sub    sopragg
PFX all   sopral sub    soprall
PFX all   sopram sub    sopramm
PFX all   sopran sub    soprann
PFX all   soprap sub    soprapp
PFX all   soprar sub    soprarr
PFX all   sopras sub    soprass
PFX all   soprat sub    sopratt
PFX all   soprav sub    sopravv
PFX all   sopraz sub    soprazz
PFX all   sovra  sub
PFX all   sovr   sub
PFX all   sovrab sub    sovrabb
PFX all   sovrac sub    sovracc
PFX all   sovrad sub    sovradd
PFX all   sovraf sub    sovraff
PFX all   sovrag sub    sovragg
PFX all   sovral sub    sovrall
PFX all   sovram sub    sovramm
PFX all   sovran sub    sovrann
PFX all   sovrap sub    sovrapp
PFX all   sovrar sub    sovrarr
PFX all   sovras sub    sovrass
PFX all   sovrat sub    sovratt
PFX all   sovrav sub    sovravv
PFX all   sovraz sub    sovrazz
PFX all   super  sub
PFX all  0       super
PFX all   sotto  super
PFX all   sott   super
PFX all   sub    super
PFX all  0       sur
